Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4912.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2403. Notwithstanding article 6, a person may engage in the business of or act in the capacity of a residential builder or a residential maintenance and alteration contractor or salesperson in this state without a license under this article, if the person is 1 of the following: (a) An authorized representative of the United States government, this state, or a county, township, city, village, or other political subdivision of this state. (b) An owner of property, with reference to a structure on the property for the owner's own use and occupancy. (c) An owner of rental property, with reference to the maintenance and alteration of that rental property. (d) An officer of a court who is acting within the scope of that office. (e) A person other than the salesperson that engages solely in the business of performing work and services under contract with a residential builder or a residential maintenance and alteration contractor that is licensed under this article. (f) A person that is working on 1 undertaking or project by 1 or more contracts, if the aggregate contract price for the labor, material, and any other items for the undertaking or project is less than $600.00. The exemption described in this subdivision does not apply if the work of a construction is only a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a different residential builder or residential maintenance and alteration contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made in contracts of amounts less than $600.00, to evade this act. (g) An electrical contractor that who is licensed under article 7 of the skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5701 to 339.5739. The exemption described in this subdivision applies only to the electrical installation, electrical maintenance, or electrical repair work that is performed by the electrical contractor. (h) A plumbing contractor that who is licensed under article 11 of the skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.6101 to 339.6133. The exemption described in this subdivision applies only to plumbing installation, plumbing maintenance, or plumbing repair work that is performed by the plumbing contractor. (i) A mechanical contractor that who is licensed under article 8 of the skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5801 to 339.5819. The exemption described in this subdivision applies only to mechanical installation, mechanical maintenance, or mechanical repair work that is performed by the mechanical contractor. (j) A person that engages solely in the business of sanding floors.